src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ======================================== !
!! !!!Propernoun morphology for Inari Saami
! ======================================== !

!! TODO:
!! These are not in use:
!! ANAR DUBAI DUBAI-plc DUBAI-sur MAKI 

LEXICON Proper_infix !!= * __@CODE@__ is the de Silva lexicon
+N+Prop+Attr: # ; 

LEXICON FirstTag !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Attr: # ; 
+N+Prop+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#:- ProperNoun ;
! RProp ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Attr:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! for reference: sme entry.

LEXICON TEMPORARY !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ; !temporary solution to add +Sem/Plc

LEXICON V_TEMPORARY !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ; !temporary solution to add +Sem/Plc

LEXICON NIEMI !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i ACCRA ;

!LEXICON ACCRA-surplc   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ACCRA ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-ani !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: ACCRA ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

!LEXICON ACCRA-plcmal   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA ;


LEXICON ACCRA-Y-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-malsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA ;


LEXICON ACCRA-Y-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ACCRA ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
ACCRA-Y-plc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-Y-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON ACCRA  !!= * __@CODE@__ SM1
+Attr:  flagK ;
+Sg+Nom:  flagK ;
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;   	
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;		
+Sg+Ill:%>n flagK ;	
+Sg+Loc:%>st flagK ;	
+Sg+Com:%>i5n flagK ;  
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

!LEXICON SALLA-plc
!+N+Prop: SALLA ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
!
!LEXICON SALLA
!+Sg+Nom: flagK ;   !kirkko
!+Sg+Gen:^WG flagK ;   !kirho
!+Sg+Acc:^WG flagK ;   !ki´rho
!+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n flagK ;   !kiirkon
!+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN%>in flagK ;   !kirhoin
!+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá flagK ;   !kirhottáá
!+Ess:%>n    flagK ;   !kirkkon
!+Par:%>d    flagK ;   !kirkkod
!



LEXICON HANNOLA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:a ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:a ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON HANNOLA-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:a ACCRA ;

LEXICON LONDON-orgplc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON LONDONBERN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: LONDON ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON GIRUNA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:a ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:a ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ISSAAK-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom:ák flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Gen:ák flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Acc:ák flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Loc:ákist flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill:ákân flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Com:ákáin flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:ák BEL ;


LEXICON KIARUN-mal 
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: KIARUN ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:ák BEL ;

LEXICON KIARUN-plc 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: KIARUN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON KIARUN !!= @CODE@ = 3KIELES
+Attr:^WG^RLEN flagK ; !kielâs
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN flagK ; !kielâs
+Ess:^WG^RLEN%>in flagK ;   !kielâsin 
!+Par:^WG^RLEN%>id flagK ;    !kielâsid   
+Sg+Gen: flagK ;   !kiellâs    
+Sg+Acc: flagK ;      !kiellâs
+Sg+Ill:^CSH%>ân flagK ;  !kielâsân
+Sg+Loc:^CSH%>ist flagK ; !kielâsist
+Sg+Com:^CSH%>áin flagK ; !kielâsáin
+Sg+Abe:%>ttáá flagK ;  !kiellâsttáá
+Cmp/SgNom:^WG^RLEN RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;


LEXICON LYEME-plc 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: LYEME ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON SVEICCI-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SVEICCI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON SVEICCI-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: SVEICCI ;

LEXICON SVEICCI-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: SVEICCI ;

LEXICON SVEICCI-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: SVEICCI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> BEL ;

LEXICON SVEICCI-fem
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: SVEICCI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLENG%> BEL ;

LEXICON SVEICCI-ani
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: SVEICCI ;


LEXICON SVEICCI
@U.Cap.Obl@ X_FADDA_SG ;
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN RProp ; 
 :^WG^RLEN PERSNAME-GENCMPflag ;
 PERSNAME-NOMCMPflag ;

 
 
LEXICON ERVASTI  !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+Attr:i  flagK ;
+Sg+Nom:i  flagK ;
+Sg+Gen:i flagK ;   	
+Sg+Acc:i flagK ;		
+Sg+Ill:i%>n flagK ;	
+Sg+Loc:i%>st flagK ;	
+Sg+Com:i%>in flagK ; 
+Cmp/SgNom:i RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:i RProp ; 
          :i PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

 
!LEXICON EUROOP-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: EUROOP ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;
!
!LEXICON EUROOP-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: EUROOP ;
!!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
!
 
!LEXICON EUROOP !!= * __@CODE@__
! +Attr: flagK ;   	    
! +Sg+Nom: flagK ;   	    
!! +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:pa flagK ;   	    
! +Sg+Gen: flagK ;   	
! +Sg+Acc: flagK ;		
! +Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ;	
! +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>âst flagK ;	
! +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ast flagK ;	
! +Sg+Loc:%>ist flagK ;	
! +Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ; 
!+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
!+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
!PERSNAME-CMPflag ;
 
LEXICON OCOMAS-plc 
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: OCOMAS ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;


LEXICON OCOMAS
 +Attr: flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Nom: flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Gen: flagK ;   	
 +Sg+Acc: flagK ;		
 +Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc:%>âst flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ast flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ist flagK ;	
 +Sg+Com:š%>áin flagK ; 
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;
 
 
LEXICON LONDON !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Attr: flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Nom: flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Gen: flagK ;   	
 +Sg+Acc: flagK ;		
 +Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc:%>ist flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:%>âst flagK ;	
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth+Use/NG:%>ast flagK ;	
 +Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ; 
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

LEXICON C-FI-NEN !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Attr:nen flagK ;
 +Sg+Nom:nen flagK ;   	   ! Itkonen 
 +Sg+Gen+Cmp:%>s- R ; 		! Itkos  	
 +Sg+Gen:%>sii flagK ; 		! Itkosii  	
 +Sg+Acc:%>s flagK ;		! Itkos
 +Sg+Ill:%>sâžân flagK ;		! Itkosâžân
 +Sg+Ill:%>sân flagK ;		! Itkosân
 +Sg+Loc:%>siist flagK ;		! Itkosist
 +Sg+Com:%>sáin flagK ; 		! Itkosáin
 +Sg+Abe:%>sttáá flagK ; 		! Itkosttáá
 +Pl+Nom:%>siih flagK ; 		! Itkosiih
 +Pl+Gen:%>sij flagK ; 		! Itkosij
 +Pl+Acc:%>sijd flagK ; 		! Itkosijd
 +Pl+Ill:%>sáid flagK ; 		! Itkosáid
 +Pl+Loc:%>sijn flagK ; 		! Itkosijn
 +Pl+Abe:%>sijttáá flagK ; 		! Itkosijttáá
+Cmp/SgNom:nen RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgNom:s RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:s RProp ; 
 :s PERSNAME-CMPflag ;

LEXICON BERN !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom: flagK ;   	    
 +Attr: flagK ;   	    
 +Sg+Gen: flagK ;   	
 +Sg+Acc: flagK ;		
 +Sg+Ill:%>ân flagK ;	
 +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>in flagK ;	!Nasaretin Hollandin
 +Sg+Loc:%>ist flagK ;	
 +Sg+Com:%>áin flagK ;   
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:%>ijn flagK ;   
+Cmp/SgNom: RProp ; 
+Cmp/SgGen: RProp ; 
 :a PERSNAME-CMPflag ;
 
 

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ACCRA ;
LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ACCRA ;
LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-ani !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: ACCRA ;
LEXICON ACCRA-femplc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
LEXICON ACCRA-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-malfem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-malsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ACCRA ;
LEXICON ACCRA-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ACCRA ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
ACCRA-A-plc ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-org !!= * __@CODE@__
:a ACCRA-org ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
:a ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON ACCRA-A-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
:a ACCRA-fem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:a BEL ;

LEXICON ACCRA_MWE-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
ACCRA-plc ;


LEXICON ACCRA-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ACCRA-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;


LEXICON MOLDAVIA-plc
:a ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MOLDAVIA-LOAN-plc
:a ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;

LEXICON MALAWI-plc
:i ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MACKENZIE-plc
:e ACCRA-plc ;


LEXICON BISSAU-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON PERU-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ACCRA ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI-ani   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: ERVASTI ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plcmal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI-femplc   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI-femsur   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ERVASTI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI-malfem   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: ERVASTI ;
!
!LEXICON ERVASTI-malsur   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen:i BEL ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI-objplc  * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: ERVASTI ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: ERVASTI ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: ERVASTI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-sur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: ERVASTI ;


LEXICON BERN-LOAN-obj !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: BERN ;
LEXICON BERN-LOAN-org !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Org: BERN ;
LEXICON BERN-LOAN-plc !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: A_LASJ ;

LEXICON BERN-ani !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Ani: BERN ;

!LEXICON BERN-femplc   * __@CODE@__
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: BERN ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc: BERN ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;

LEXICON BERN-fem !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON BERN-mal !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal: BERN ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/N:%- MaleRelative ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Cmp/SgGen: BEL ;

LEXICON BERN-objsur !!= * __@CODE@__
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj: BERN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur: BERN ;
